District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1744

Status of person previously licensed.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 9, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(g), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(h), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1928.